District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.03

License required.

A nurse staffing agency shall be licensed by the Department before providing or referring any nursing personnel, Home Health Aides, or Personal Care Aides to a health care facility or agency, or to an individual, for the purpose of rendering temporary nursing services or related aide services within the District of Columbia.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 3, 50 DCR 10914